Utah statutes.
58-22-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created a Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors
Licensing Board.  The board shall consist of four licensed professional
engineers, one licensed professional structural engineer, one licensed
professional land surveyor, and one member from the general public.  The
composition of the four professional engineers on the board shall be
representative of the various professional engineering disciplines.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and shall serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201.  The members of the board who are professional engineers shall be
appointed from among nominees recommended by representative engineering
societies in this state.  The member of the board who is a land surveyor shall
be appointed from among nominees recommended by representative professional
land surveyor societies.
(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with
Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of
its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:
(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or
unprofessional conduct of a license; and
(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or
advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the
board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning the complaint.
